Missouri, session 2026, HB1730.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 571.010 and 571.020, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 571.010, 571.020, 571.935, and 571.940, to
read as follows:
571.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Antique, curio or relic firearm", any firearm so defined by the National Gun
Control Act, 18 U.S.C. Title 26, Section 5845, and the United States Treasury/Bureau of
Alcohol Tobacco and Firearms, 27 CFR Section 178.11:
(a) "Antique firearm" is any firearm not designed or redesigned for using rim fire or
conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898,
said ammunition not being manufactured any longer; this includes any matchlock, wheel
lock, flintlock, percussion cap or similar type ignition system, or replica thereof;
(b) "Curio or relic firearm" is any firearm deriving value as a collectible weapon due
to its unique design, ignition system, operation or at least fifty years old, associated with a
historical event, renown personage or major war;
(2) "Blackjack", any instrument that is designed or adapted for the purpose of
stunning or inflicting physical injury by striking a person, and which is readily capable of
lethal use;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1730 2
(3) "Blasting agent", any material or mixture, consisting of fuel and oxidizer that is
intended for blasting, but not otherwise defined as an explosive under this section, provided
that the finished product, as mixed for use of shipment, cannot be detonated by means of a
numbered 8 test blasting cap when unconfined;
(4) "Concealable firearm", any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in length,
measured from the face of the bolt or standing breech;
(5) "Deface", to alter or destroy the manufacturer's or importer's serial number or any
other distinguishing number or identification mark;
(6) "Detonator", any device containing a detonating charge that is used for initiating
detonation in an explosive, including but not limited to, electric blasting caps of instantaneous
and delay types, nonelectric blasting caps for use with safety fuse or shock tube and
detonating cord delay connectors;
(7) "Explosive weapon", any explosive, incendiary, or poison gas bomb or similar
device designed or adapted for the purpose of inflicting death, serious physical injury, or
substantial property damage; or any device designed or adapted for delivering or shooting
such a weapon. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "explosive" shall mean any
chemical compound mixture or device, the primary or common purpose of which is to
function by explosion, including but not limited to, dynamite and other high explosives, pellet
powder, initiating explosives, detonators, safety fuses, squibs, detonating cords, igniter cords,
and igniters or blasting agents;
(8) "Firearm", any weapon that is designed or adapted to expel a projectile by the
action of an explosive;
(9) "Firearm silencer" or "firearm suppressor", any instrument, attachment, or
appliance that is designed or adapted to muffle the noise made by the firing of any firearm;
(10) "Gas gun", any gas ejection device, weapon, cartridge, container or contrivance
other than a gas bomb that is designed or adapted for the purpose of ejecting any poison gas
that will cause death or serious physical injury, but not any device that ejects a repellant or
temporary incapacitating substance;
(11) "Generic and insignificant part", an item that has manufacturing or
consumer product applications other than inclusion in a firearm suppressor. The term
"generic and insignificant part" includes a spring, screw, nut, or pin;
(12) "Intoxicated", substantially impaired mental or physical capacity resulting from
introduction of any substance into the body;
[(12)] (13) "Knife", any dagger, dirk, stiletto, or bladed hand instrument that is readily
capable of inflicting serious physical injury or death by cutting or stabbing a person. For
purposes of this chapter, knife does not include any ordinary pocketknife with no blade more
than four inches in length;

HB 1730 3
[(13)] (14) "Knuckles", any instrument that consists of finger rings or guards made of
a hard substance that is designed or adapted for the purpose of inflicting serious physical
injury or death by striking a person with a fist enclosed in the knuckles;
[(14)] (15) "Machine gun", any firearm that is capable of firing more than one shot
automatically, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger;
[(15)] (16) "Manufacture", forging, casting, machining, or another process for
working a material;
(17) "Projectile weapon", any bow, crossbow, pellet gun, slingshot or other weapon
that is not a firearm, which is capable of expelling a projectile that could inflict serious
physical injury or death by striking or piercing a person;
[(16)] (18) "Rifle", any firearm designed or adapted to be fired from the shoulder and
to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire a projectile through a
rifled bore by a single function of the trigger;
[(17)] (19) "School", any charter school, as such term is defined in section 160.400,
any private school, as such term is defined in section 166.700, or any public school, as such
term is defined in section 160.011;
[(18)] (20) "Short barrel", a barrel length of less than sixteen inches for a rifle and
eighteen inches for a shotgun, both measured from the face of the bolt or standing breech, or
an overall rifle or shotgun length of less than twenty-six inches;
[(19)] (21) "Shotgun", any firearm designed or adapted to be fired from the shoulder
and to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire a number of shot or a
single projectile through a smooth bore barrel by a single function of the trigger;
[(20)] (22) "Spring gun", any fused, timed or nonmanually controlled trap or device
designed or adapted to set off an explosion for the purpose of inflicting serious physical injury
or death;
[(21)] (23) "Switchblade knife", any knife which has a blade that folds or closes into
the handle or sheath, and:
(a) That opens automatically by pressure applied to a button or other device located
on the handle; or
(b) That opens or releases from the handle or sheath by the force of gravity or by the
application of centrifugal force.
571.020. 1. A person commits an offense if such person knowingly possesses,
manufactures, transports, repairs, or sells:
(1) An explosive weapon;
(2) An explosive, incendiary or poison substance or material with the purpose to
possess, manufacture or sell an explosive weapon;
(3) A gas gun;

HB 1730 4
(4) A bullet or projectile which explodes or detonates upon impact because of an
independent explosive charge after having been shot from a firearm; [or]
(5) Knuckles; or
(6) Any of the following in violation of federal law:
(a) A machine gun;
(b) A short-barreled rifle or shotgun; or
(c) [A firearm silencer; or
(d)] A switchblade knife.
2. A person does not commit an offense pursuant to this section if his or her conduct
involved any of the items in subdivisions (1) to (5) of subsection 1 of this section, the item
was possessed in conformity with any applicable federal law, and the conduct:
(1) Was incident to the performance of official duty by the Armed Forces, National
Guard, a governmental law enforcement agency, or a penal institution; or
(2) Was incident to engaging in a lawful commercial or business transaction with an
organization enumerated in subdivision (1) of this [section] subsection; or
(3) Was incident to using an explosive weapon in a manner reasonably related to a
lawful industrial or commercial enterprise; or
(4) Was incident to displaying the weapon in a public museum or exhibition; or
(5) Was incident to using the weapon in a manner reasonably related to a lawful
dramatic performance.
3. An offense pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3) or (6) of subsection 1 of this section
is a class D felony; a crime pursuant to subdivision (4) or (5) of subsection 1 of this section is
a class A misdemeanor.
4. The offense of knowingly possessing, manufacturing, transporting, repairing,
or selling a firearm silencer, as it existed immediately before August 28, 2026, shall not
be prosecuted on or after August 28, 2026. If on August 28, 2026, a criminal action is
pending for such offense, the action is dismissed on that date. However, a final
conviction for such offense that exists on August 28, 2026, shall not be affected.
571.935. 1. (1) For the purposes of this section, a firearm suppressor is
manufactured in this state if the item is manufactured:
(a) In this state from basic materials; and
(b) Without the inclusion of any part imported from another state other than a
generic and insignificant part.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a firearm suppressor is manufactured in this
state if it is manufactured as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection without
regard to whether a firearm imported into this state from another state is attached to or
used in conjunction with the suppressor.

HB 1730 5
2. (1) A firearm suppressor that is manufactured in this state and remains in
this state is not subject to federal law or federal regulation, including registration, under
the authority of the United States Congress to regulate interstate commerce.
(2) A basic material from which a firearm suppressor is manufactured in this
state, including unmachined steel, is not a firearm suppressor and is not subject to
federal regulation under the authority of the United States Congress to regulate
interstate commerce as if it actually were a firearm suppressor.
3. A firearm suppressor manufactured and sold in this state shall have the words
"Made in Missouri" clearly stamped on it.
4. On written notification to the attorney general by a United States citizen who
resides in this state of the citizen's intent to manufacture a firearm suppressor to which
subsection 2 of this section applies, the attorney general shall seek a declaratory
judgment from a federal district court in this state that subsection 2 of this section is
consistent with the Constitution of the United States.
5. The provisions of this section shall apply only to firearm suppressors that are
manufactured on or after August 28, 2026.
571.940. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply to:
(1) The state of Missouri, including an agency, department, commission, bureau,
board, office, council, court, or other entity that is in any branch of state government
and that is created by the constitution or a statute of this state, including a university
system or a system of higher education;
(2) The governing body of a municipality, county, or special district or authority;
(3) An officer, employee, or other body that is part of a municipality, county, or
special district or authority, including a sheriff, municipal police department, municipal
attorney, or county attorney; and
(4) A prosecuting attorney, county counselor, or circuit attorney.
2. (1) An entity described in subsection 1 of this section shall not adopt a rule,
order, ordinance, or policy under which the entity enforces, or by consistent action
allows the enforcement of, a federal statute, order, rule, or regulation that purports to
regulate a firearm suppressor if the statute, order, rule, or regulation imposes a
prohibition, restriction, or other regulation that does not exist under the laws of this
state.
(2) No entity described in subsection 1 of this section and no person employed by
or otherwise under the direction or control of the entity shall enforce or attempt to
enforce any federal statute, order, rule, or regulation described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.

HB 1730 6
3. (1) An entity described in subsection 1 of this section shall not receive state
grant funds if the entity adopts a rule, order, ordinance, or policy under which the entity
enforces a federal law described in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section or, by
consistent action, allows the enforcement of a federal law described in subdivision (1) of
subsection 2 of this section.
(2) State grant funds for the entity shall be denied for the fiscal year following
the year in which a final judicial determination in an action brought under this section is
made that the entity has violated subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section.
4. (1) Any citizen residing in the jurisdiction of an entity described in subsection
1 of this section may file a complaint with the attorney general if the citizen offers
evidence to support an allegation that the entity has adopted a rule, order, ordinance, or
policy under which the entity enforces a federal law described in subdivision (1) of
subsection 2 of this section or that the entity, by consistent action, allows the
enforcement of a federal law described in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section.
The citizen shall include with the complaint any evidence the citizen has in support of
the complaint.
(2) If the attorney general determines that a complaint filed under subdivision
(1) of this subsection against an entity described in subsection 1 of this section is valid, to
compel the entity's compliance with this section, the attorney general may file a petition
for a writ of mandamus or apply for other appropriate equitable relief in the circuit
court of Cole County or the circuit court in any county in which the principal office of
the entity is located. The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses incurred
obtaining relief under this subdivision, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees,
investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition costs.
(3) In any appeal of a suit brought under subdivision (2) of this subsection, the
appellate court shall expedite the case by entering such scheduling orders as are
necessary to ensure that a final order or judgment will be entered with the least possible
delay.
✔